Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska34-115
Lawful fences, defined.

Lawful fences of different kinds used for fence to enclose lands shall be as hereinafter defined. (1) A rail fence shall consist of at least six rails, such rails to be secured by stakes at the end of each panel, well set in the ground, with a rider on the stakes. (2) A board fence shall consist of not less than three boards of at least five inches in width and one inch thick; such boards to be well secured to posts; the posts to be not more than eight feet apart. (3) A rail and post fence shall consist of at least three rails, well secured at each end to posts; the posts not to be more than ten feet apart. (4) A pole and post fence shall consist of not less than four poles, to be well secured to posts; the posts not to be more than seven feet apart. (5) A wire fence shall consist of at least four wires, of a size not less than number nine fencing wire, to be well secured to posts, the posts to be at no greater distance than one rod from each other; and there shall be placed between every two of the posts one stake or post to which the wire shall be attached. Any of such wires may be a barbed wire composed of two or more single wire strands twisted into a cable wire with metal barbs thereon averaging not more than five inches apart, each of such single wire strands to be of a size not less than number twelve and one-half gauge fencing wire. (6) A hog and sheep tight fence shall consist of one barb wire at the ground, next above, one section of woven wire twenty-six inches high, consisting of not less than seven strands, the upper and lower strands to be number nine wire, intermediate strands to be number eleven wire with stays not more than twelve inches apart, and at the top, three barb wires at intervals of six, nine, and nine inches; and the whole shall be securely fastened to posts at no greater distance than one rod from each other, and there shall be placed between every two of the posts one stake or post to which the wire shall be attached. (7) All other fences made and constructed of boards, rails, poles, stones, hedge plants, or other material which upon evidence is declared to be as strong and well calculated to protect enclosures and is as effective for resisting breaching stock shall be considered a lawful fence.

Laws 1867 (Ter.), § 1, p. 17;

R.S.1913, § 2492;

Laws 1915, c. 43, § 18, p. 120;

C.S.1922, § 2431;

C.S.1929, § 34-115;

R.S.1943, § 34-115;

Laws 1947, c. 127, § 1, p. 366;

Laws 1999, LB 776, § 3.

This section was not intended to apply to railroads. Chicago, B. & Q. R. R. Co. v. James, 26 Neb. 188, 41 N.W. 992 (1889).

Lawful wire fence must consist of at least four wires. Baltensperger v. United States, 174 F.Supp. 601 (D. Neb. 1959).